District of Columbia statutes.
47-208

Items included in annual estimates — Employees and supplies for maintenance of sewers.

Estimates in detail shall be submitted annually for the employment of mechanics, laborers, and watchmen, and the purchase of coal, oils, waste, and other supplies for the maintenance of sewers.

History

June 27, 1906, 34 Stat. 494, ch. 3553
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-208.
1973 Ed., § 47-206.